Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.310

License renewal.

(1) If a licensee desires to apply for a renewal of its license, a request for a renewal shall be filed ninety days before the expiration date of the license. If the department has failed to act at the time of the expiration date of the license, the license shall continue in effect until such time as the department acts.

(2) License renewal under this section does not apply to nonexpiring licenses described in *RCW 43.215.260.

[ 2011 c 297 s 3; 2006 c 265 s 308. Formerly RCW 43.215.270.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.260 was recodified as RCW 43.216.305 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.